Maine, session 132, LD832.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
ADMINISTRATIVE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES, DEPARTMENT OF
Miscellaneous Acts and Resolves - Finance 0306
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to the Vassalboro Sanitary District for debt reduction.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $2,000,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $2,000,000 $0